Utah statutes.
63K-2-206.   Other emergency powers of governor unaffected.

The powers vested in the governor under this act shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other emergency powers otherwise constitutionally or statutorily vested in the governor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

